de: Allergene: Alpha-Isomethylionon; Amyl Cinnamal (Alpha-Amylzimtaldehyd); Amylzimtalkohol; Anisylalkohol; Benzylalkohol; Benzylbenzoat; Benzylcinnamat; Benzylsalicylat; Cinnamal; Zimtalkohol; Citral; Citronellol; Cumarin; Eugenol; Evernia furfuracea (Baummoos)-Extrakt; Evernia prunastri (Eichenmoos)-Extrakt; Farnesol; Geraniol; Hexylzimtaldehyd; Hydroxycitronellal; Isoeugenol; Limonin; Linalool; Lyral (4-(4-Hydroxy-4-methylpentyl)cyclohex-3-en-1-carbaldehyd); Methyl-2-octynoat (Methylheptincarbonat); Myroxylon pereirae (peruanischer Balsam); Sonstiges
sv: Allergener: Alfa-isometyljonon; Amylcinnamal (amylcinnamaldehyd); Amylcinnamylalkohol; Anisylalkohol; Bensylalkohol; Bensylbensoat; Bensylcinnamat; Bensylsalicylat; Cinnamal; Cinnamylalkohol; Citral; Citronellol; Kumarin; Eugenol; Tträdmosseextrakt (evernia furfuracea); Ekmosseextrakt (evernia prunastri); Farnesol; Geraniol; Hexylcinnamal; Hydroxicitronellal; Isoeugenol; Limonen; Linalool; Lyral (hydroxiisohexyl 3-cyklohexenkarboxaldehyd); Metyl-2-oktynoat (metylheptinkarbonat); Myroxylon pereirae (perubalsam); Annat
da: Allergener: Alfa-isomethylionon; Amylkanel (amylkanelaldehyd); Amylcinnamylalkohol; Anisylalkohol; Benzylalkohol; Benzylbenzoat; Benzylcinnamat; Benzylsalicylat; Cinnamal; Cinnamylalkohol; Citral; Citronellol; Kumarin; Eugenol; Evernia furfuracea (træmos) ekstrakt; Evernia prunastri (egemos) ekstrakt; Farnesol; Geraniol; Hexylcinnamal; Hydroxycitronellal; Isoeugenol; Limonen; Linalool; Lyral (hydroxyisohexyl 3-cyclohexencarboxaldehyd); Methyl-2-octynoat (methylheptincarbonat); Myroxylon pereirae (balsam peru); Andet
th: สารก่อภูมิแพ้: อัลฟา-ไอโซเมทิลไอโอโนน; เอมิลซินนามอล (เอมิลซินนามิกอัลดีไฮด์); เอมิลซินนามิลแอลกอฮอล์; อะนิซิลแอลกอฮอล์; เบนซิลแอลกอฮอล์; เบนซิลเบนโซเอต; เบนซิลซินนาเมต; เบนซิลซาลิไซเลต; ซินนามอล; ซินนามิลแอลกอฮอล์; ซิทรัล; ซิโตรเนลลอล; คูมาริน; ยูจีนอล; สารสกัดจาก Evernia furfuracea (มอสตามต้นไม้); สารสกัดจาก Evernia prunastri (มอสตามต้นโอ๊ค); ฟาร์นีซอล; เจอรานิออล; เฮกซิลซินนามอล; ไฮดรอกซีซิโตรเนลลาล; ไอโซยูจินอล; ลิโมนีน; ลินาลูล; ไลรัล (ไฮดรอกซีไอโซเฮกซิล 3-ไซโคลเฮกซีน คาร์บอกซาลดีไฮด์); เมทิล 2-ออกทิโนเอต (เมทิลเฮปตินคาร์บอเนต); Myroxylon pereirae (ขี้ผึ้งเปรู); อื่นๆ
tr: Alerjenler: Alfa-izometil iyonon; Amil sinnamal (amil sinamik aldehit); Amilsinnamil alkol; Anisil alkol; Benzil alkol; Benzil benzoat; Benzil sinamat; Benzil salisilat; Sinnamal; Sinamil alkol; Sitral; Sitronellol; Kumarin; Eugenol; Evernia furfuracea (ağaç yosunu) özü; Evernia prunastri (meşe yosunu) özü; Farnesol; Geraniol; Heksil sinnamal; Hidroksisitronelal; Isoeugenol; Limonen; Linalool; Liral (hidroksiizoheksil 3-sikloheksen karboksaldehit); Metil 2-oktinoat (metil heptin karbonat); Myroxylon pereirae (balsam peru); Diğer
zh-CN: 过敏原: α-异甲基紫罗兰酮; 戊基肉桂醛; 戊基肉桂醇; 茴香醇; 苯甲醇; 苯甲酸苄酯; 肉桂酸苄酯; 水杨酸苄酯; 肉桂醛; 肉桂醇; 柠檬醛; 香茅醇; 香豆素; 丁子香酚; 橡苔地衣（树苔）提取物; 橡苔（栎扁枝衣）提取物; 金合欢醇; 香叶醇; 己基肉桂醛; 羟基香茅醛; 异丁子香酚; 柠檬烯; 芳樟醇; 新铃兰醛（羟基异己基 3-环己烯甲醛）; 2-辛炔酸甲酯（碳酸甲基庚酸）; 秘鲁香树（秘鲁香脂）; 其他
cs: Alergeny: Alfa-isomethyl ionon; Alfa-amyl-skořicový aldehyd (amyl cinnamal); Amylcinnamylalkohol; Anisylalkohol; Benzylalkohol; Benzylbenzoát; Benzylcinnamát; Benzylsalicylát; Cinnamal; Skořicový alkohol; Citral; Citronellol; Kumarin; Eugenol; Extrakt z Evernia furfuracea (stromového mechu); Extrakt z Evernia prunastri (dubový mech); Farnesol; Geraniol; Hexyl cinnamal; Hydroxycitronellal; Isoeugenol; Limonen; Linalool; Lyral (hydroxymethylpentylcyklohexenkarbaldehyd); Methylheptinkarbonát (methyl-okt-2-ynoát); Myroxylon pereirae (balzám Peru); Jiné
lt-LT: Alergenai: Alfa-izometiliononas; Amilo cinamalas (amilo cinamono aldehidas); Amilcinamilo alkoholis; Anizilo alkoholis; Benzilo alkoholis; Benzilo benzoatas; Benzilo cinamatas; Benzilo salicilatas; Cinamalas; Cinamilo alkoholis; Citralis; Citronelolis; Kumarinas; Eugenolis; Sėleninės briedragės (medžių samanų) ekstraktas; Sodinės briedragės (ąžuolo samanų) ekstraktas; Farnesolis; Geraniolis; Heksilo cinamalas; Hidroksicitronelalis; Izoeugenolis; Limonenas; Linalolis; Lyral (hidroksiizoheksilo 3-ciklohekseno karboksaldehidas); Metil-2-oktinoatas (metilheptino karbonatas); Myroxylon pereirae (Peru balzaminis taukminas); Kita
hr-HR: Alergeni: Alfa-izometil jonon; Amil cinamal (amil cinam aldehid); Amilcinamil alkohol; Anisil alkohol; Benzil alkohol; Benzil benzoat; Benzil cinamat; Benzil salicilat; Cinnamal; Cinamil alkohol; Citral; Citronelol; Kumarin; Eugenol; Ekstrakt lišaja Evernia furfuracea (lišaj na kori bora i jele); Ekstrakt lišaja Evernia prunastri (lišaj na kori hrasta).; Farnezol; Geraniol; Heksil cinamal; Hidroksicitronelal; Izoeugenol; Limonen; Linalol; Liral (hidroksiizoheksil 3-cikloheksen karboksaldehid); Metil 2-oktinoat (metil heptin karbonat); Myroxylon pereirae (peruanski balzam); Ostalo
es: Alérgenos: Alfa-isometil ionona; Amilo cinámico (aldehído amil cinámico); Alcohol amilcinamílico; Alcohol anisílico; Alcohol bencílico; Benzoato de bencilo; Cinamato de bencilo; Salicilato de bencilo; Cinamal; Alcohol cinámico; Citral; Citronelol; Cumarina; Eugenol; Extracto de Evernia furfuracea (musgo de árbol); Extracto de Evernia prunastri (musgo de roble); Farnesol; Geraniol; Hexil cinamal; Hidroxicitronelal; Isoeugenol; Limoneno; Linalol; Lyral (hidroxi-isohexil 3-ciclohexeno carboxaldehído); 2-octinoato de metilo (carbonato de heptina de metilo); Myroxylon pereirae (bálsamo de Perú); Otros
en: Allergens: Alpha-isomethyl ionone; Amyl cinnamal (amyl cinnamic aldehyde); Amylcinnamyl alcohol; Anisyl alcohol; Benzyl alcohol; Benzyl benzoate; Benzyl cinnamate; Benzyl salicylate; Cinnamal; Cinnamyl alcohol; Citral; Citronellol; Coumarin; Eugenol; Evernia furfuracea (treemoss) extract; Evernia prunastri (oakmoss) extract; Farnesol; Geraniol; Hexyl cinnamal; Hydroxycitronellal; Isoeugenol; Limonene; Linalool; Lyral (hydroxyisohexyl 3-cyclohexene carboxaldehyde); Methyl 2-octynoate (methyl heptin carbonate); Myroxylon pereirae (balsam peru); Other
sl-SI: Alergeni: Alfa-izometil ionon; Amil cinamal (amil cinamal aldehid); Amilcinamil alkohol; Anizil alkohol; Benzil alkohol; Benzil benzoat; Benzil cinamat; Benzil salicilat; Cinamal; Cinamil alkohol; Citral; Citronelol; Kumarin; Eugenol; Izvleček Evernia furfuracea (drevesni mah); Izvleček Evernia prunastri (hrastov mah); Farnesol; Geraniol; Heksil cinamal; Hidroksicitronelal; Izoevgenol; Limonen; Linalol; Lyral (hidroksiizoheksil 3-cikloheksen karboksaldehid); Metil 2-oktinoat (metil heptin karbonat); Myroxylon pereirae (perujski balzam); Drugi
ru: Аллергены: Альфа-изометилионон; Амилциннамал (амилциннамиловый альдегид); Амилциннамиловый спирт; Анисовый спирт; Бензиловый спирт; Бензилбензоат; Бензилциннамат; Бензилсалицилат; Циннамаль; Циннамиловый спирт; Цитраль; Цитронеллол; Кумарин; Эвгенол; Экстракт Evernia Furfuracea (древесного мха); Экстракт Evernia Prunastri (дубового мха); Фарнезол; Гераниол; Гексилциннамаль; Гидроксицитронеллаль; Изоэвгенол; Лимонен; Линалоол; Лираль (гидроксиизогексил 3-циклогексенкарбоксальдегид); Метил 2-октиноат (метилгептинкарбонат); Myroxylon Pereirae (перуанский бальзам); Другое
pt-BR: Alérgenos: Alfa-isometil ionona; Amil cinamal (aldeído amil cinâmico); Álcool amilcinamílico; Álcool anisílico; Álcool benzílico; Benzoato de benzila; Cinamato de benzila; Salicilato de benzila; Cinamaldeído; Álcool cinamílico; Citral; Citronelol; Cumarina; Eugenol; Extrato de Evernia furfuracea (musgo de árvore); Extrato de Evernia prunastri (musgo de carvalho); Farnesol; Geraniol; Hexil cinamaldeído; Hidroxicitronelal; Isoeugenol; Limoneno; Linalol; Lyral (hidroxiisohexil 3-ciclohexeno carboxaldeído); 2-octinoato de metila (carbonato de metil heptina); Myroxylon pereirae (bálsamo do Peru); Outro
bg-BG: Алергени: Алфа-изометил йонон; Амил канела (амил канелен алдехид); Амилцинамилов алкохол; Анизилов алкохол; Бензилов алкохол; Бензил бензоат; Бензилов цинамат; Бензилов салицилат; Цинамал; Цинамилов алкохол; Цитрал; Цитронелол; Кумарин; Евгенол; Екстракт от Evernia furfuracea (дървесен мъх); Екстракт от Evernia prunastri (дъбов мъх); Farnesol; Гераниол; Хексил цинамал; Хидроксицитронелал; Изоеугенол; Лимонен; Линалоол; Лирал (хидроксиизохексил 3-циклохексен карбоксалдехид); Метил 2-октиноат (метил хептин карбонат); Myroxylon pereirae (перуански балсам); Други
ko: 알레르기 유발물질: 알파-아이소메틸아이오논; 아밀신남알(아밀신나믹알데하이드); 아밀신나밀알코올; 아니실알코올; 벤질알코올; 벤질벤조에이트; 벤질신나메이트; 벤질살리실레이트; 신남알; 신나밀알코올; 시트랄; 시트로넬올; 쿠마린; 유제놀; 나무이끼추출물; 참나무이끼추출물; 파네솔; 제라니올; 헥실신남알; 하이드록시시트로넬알; 아이소유제놀; 리모넨; 리날룰; 라이랄(하이드록시아이소헥실 3-사이클로헥센 카보스알데히드); 메틸2-옥티노에이트(메틸 헵틴 카보네이트); 발삼 페루; 기타
fr: Allergènes: Alpha-isométhylionone; Amyl-cinnamal (aldéhyde amylcinnamique); Alcool amylcinnamylique; Alcool anisylique; Alcool benzylique; Benzoate de benzyle; Cinnamate de benzyle; Salicylate de benzyle; Cinnamal; Alcool cinnamylique; Citral; Citronellol; Coumarine; Eugenol; Extrait d’Evernia furfuracea (arbre mousse); Extrait d’Evernia prunastri (mousse de chêne); Farnesol; Géraniol; Hexyl cinnamal; Hydroxycitronellal; Isoeugenol; Limonène; Linalool; Lyral (hydroxyisohexyl 3-cyclohexene carboxaldehyde); Methyl 2-octynoate (méthyl heptine carbonate); Myroxylon pereirae (baume du Pérou); Autre
pl: Alergeny: Jonon alfa-izometylowy; Cynamal amylowy (aldehyd amylocynamonowy); Alkohol amylocynamylowy; Alkohol anizylowy; Alkohol benzylowy; Benzoesan benzylu; Cynamonian benzylu; Salicylan benzylu; Cynamal; Alkohol cynamylowy; Cytral; Cytronelol; Kumaryna; Eugenol; Ekstrakt z Evernia furfuracea (mchu drzewiastego); Ekstrakt z Evernia prunastri (mchu dębowego); Farnezol; Geraniol; Cynamal heksylowy; Hydroksycytronelal; Izoeugenol; Limonen; Linalol; Lyral (hydroksyizoheksylo 3-cykloheksenokarboksaldehyd); 2-oktynian metylu (węglan metyloheptyny); Myroxylon pereirae (balsam peruwiański); Pozostałe
zh-TW: 過敏原: α-異甲基紫羅蘭酮; 戊基肉桂醛 (戊桂皮醛); α-戊基肉桂醇; 對甲氧苄醇; 苯甲醇; 苯甲酸芐酯; 桂皮酸芐酯; 水楊酸芐酯; 肉桂醛; 肉桂醇; 檸檬醛; 香茅醇; 香豆素; 丁香酚; 樹苔萃取物; 橡苔萃取物; 金合歡醇; 香葉醇; 己基肉桂醛; 羥基香茅醛; 異丁香油酚; 檸檬烯; 芳樟醇; 新鈴蘭醛 (羥基異己基3-環己烯基甲醛); 2-辛炔酸甲酯 (庚炔羧酸甲酯); 祕魯香樹; 其他
ro-RO: Alergeni: Alfa-izometil iononă; Amil cinamal (aldehidă cinamică); Alcool amilcinamilic; Alcool anisilic; Alcool benzilic; Benzoat de benzil; Cinamat de benzil; Salicilat de benzil; Cinamal; Alcool cinamilic; Citral; Citronelol; Cumarină; Eugenol; Extract de Evernia furfuracea (mușchi de copac); Extract de Evernia prunastri (lichen de stejar); Farnesol; Geraniol; Hexil cinamaldehidă; Hidroxicitronelal; Izoeugenol; Limonen; Linalol; Lyral (hidroxiizohexil 3-ciclohexen carboxaldehidă); 2-octinoat de metil (heptin carbonat de metil); Myroxylon pereirae (balsam de Peru); Altele
nb: Allergener: Alfa-isometylionon; Amylkanelaldehyd; Amylcinnamylalkohol; Anisylalkohol; Benzylalkohol; Benzylbenzoat; Benzylkanel; Benzylsalisylat; Kanel; Kanelalkohol; Citral; Citronellol; Kumarin; Eugenol; Evernia furfuracea (tremose) ekstrakt; Evernia prunastri (eikmose) ekstrakt; Farnesol; Geraniol; Heksylkanel; Hydroxycitronellal; Isoeugenol; Limonene; Linalool; Lyral (hydroksyisoheksyl 3-cykloheksen karboksaldehyd); Metyl 2-oktynoat (metyl heptinkarbonat); Myroxylon pereirae (balsam peru); Annen
fi: Allergeenit: Alfaisometyyliiononi; Amyylisinnamaali (amyylisinnamaali-aldehydi); Amyylisinnamyylialkoholi; Anisyylialkoholi; Bentsyylialkoholi; Bentsyylibentsoaatti; Bentsyylisinnamaatti; Bentsyylisalisylaatti; Sinnamaali; Sinnamyylialkoholi; Sitraali; Sitronelloli; Kumariini; Eugenoli; Evernia furfuracean (Harmaahankakarveen) uute; Evernia prunastrin (valkohankajäkälän) uute; Farnesoli; Geranioli; Heksyylisinnamaali; Hydroksisitronellaali; Isoeugenoli; Limoneeni; Linalooli; Lyraali (hydroksi-isoheksyyli-3-syklohekseeni-karboksialdehydi); Metyyli-2-oktynoaatti (metyyliheptiinikarbonaatti); Myroxylon pereirae; Muu
sk-SK: Alergény: Alfa-izometyl-ionón; Amylcinamál (amylcinamínový aldehyd); Amylcinamylalkohol; Anizylalkohol; Benzylalkohol; Benzylbenzoát; Benzylcinamát; Benzylsalicylát; Škoricový; Škoricový alkohol; Citrál; Citronelol; Kumarín; Eugenol; Extrakt z Evernia furfuracea (stromový mach); Extrakt z Evernia prunastri (dubový mach); Farnesol; Geraniol; Hexylcinnamal; Hydroxycitronellal; Isoeugenol; Limonén; Linalool; Lyral (hydroxyizohexyl 3-cyklohexénkarboxaldehyd); Metyl 2-oktynoát (metyl-heptín-karbonát); Myroxylon pereirae (balzam peru); Iné
hu: Allergének: Alfa-izometil-ionon; Amyl cinnamal (amil-fahéjaldehid); Amil-fahéjalkohol; Anizil-alkohol; Benzil-alkohol; Benzil-benzoát; Benzil-cinnamát; Benzil-szalicilát; Cinnamal; Fahéjalkohol; Citrál; Citronellol; Kumarin; Eugenol; Evernia furfuracea (fazuzmó) kivonat; Evernia prunastri (tölgyfazuzmó) kivonat; Farnezol; Geraniol; Hexil-cinnamal; Hidroxicitronellál; Izo-eugenol; Limonén; Linalool; Lyral (hidroxi-izohexil-3-ciklohexén-karboxaldehid); Metil-2-oktinoát (metil-heptin-karbonát); Myroxylon pereirae (perubalzsam); Egyéb
vi: Chất gây dị ứng: Alpha-isometyl ionon; Amyl cinnamal (amyl cinnamic aldehyd); Rượu amylcinnamyl; Rượu anisyl; Rượu benzyl; Benzyl benzoat; Benzyl cinnamate; Benzyl salicylat; Cinnamal; Rượu cinnamyl; Citral; Citronellol; Coumarin; Eugenol; Chiết xuất Evernia furfuracea (rêu cây); Chiết xuất Evernia prunastri (rêu sồi); Farnesol; Geraniol; Hexyl quế; Hydroxycitronellal; Isoeugenol; Limonene; Linalool; Lyral (hydroxyisohexyl 3-cyclohexene carboxaldehyde); Methyl 2-octynoate (methyl heptin carbonate); Myroxylon pereirae (balsam peru); Khác
ja: アレルゲン: α-イソメチルイオノン; アミルシンナマル (アルミシンナミックアルデヒド); アミルシンナミルアルコール; アニシルアルコール; ベンジルアルコール; 安息香酸ベンジル; 桂皮酸ベンジル; サリチル酸ベンジル; シンナマル; シンナミルアルコール; シトラール; シトロネロール; クマリン; オイゲノール; エベルニアフルフラセア (ツリーモス) エキス; ツノマタゴケ (オークモス) エキス; ファルネソル; ゲラニオール; ヘキシルシンナマル; ヒドロキシシトロネラール; イソオイゲノール; リモネン; リナロール; リラール (ヒドロキシイソヘキシル3-シクロヘキセンカルボキシアルデヒド); 2-オクチン酸メチル (ヘプタン酸メチル); ミロキシロンペレイラエ (バルサムペルー); その他
nl: Allergenen: Alfa-isomethylionon; Amylkaneel (amylkaneelaldehyde); Amylcinnamylalcohol; Anisylalcohol; Benzylalcohol; Benzylbenzoaat; Benzylcinnamaat; Benzylsalicylaat; Cinnamal; Cinnamylalcohol; Citral; Citronellol; Cumarine; Eugenol; Evernia furfuracea (boommos)-extract; Evernia prunastri (eikenmos)-extract; Farnesol; Geraniol; Hexyl-cinnamal; Hydroxycitronellal; Isoeugenol; Limoneen; Linalool; Lyral (hydroxyisohexyl-3-cyclohexeencarboxaldehyde); Methyl-2-octynoaat (methylheptinecarbonaat); Myroxylon pereirae (Perubalsem); Andere
el: Αλλεργιογόνα: Α-ισομεθυλιονόνη; Αμυλοκινναμάλη (αμυλοκινναμωμαλδεΰδη); Αμυλοκινναμωμυλική αλκοόλη; Ανισυλική αλκοόλη; Βενζυλική αλκοόλη; Βενζοϊκό βενζύλιο; Κινναμωμικό βενζύλιο; Σαλικυλικό βενζύλιο; Κινναμάλη; Κινναμωμυλική αλκοόλη; Κιτράλη; Κιτρονελλόλη; Κουμαρίνη; Ευγενόλη; Εκχύλισμα της Evernia furfuracea (βρύα δέντρου); Εκχύλισμα της Evernia prunastri (βρύα βελανιδιάς); Φαρνεσόλη; Γερανιόλη; Εξυλοκινναμάλη; Υδροξυκιτρονελλάλη; Ισοευγενόλη; Λεμονένιο; Λιναλοόλη; Λύρα (υδροξυϊσοεξυλο 3-κυκλοεξενιο καρβοξαλδεϋδη); 2-οκτινοϊκό μεθύλιο (μεθυλεπτινεστέρας); Μυρόξυλο το περουβιανό (βάλσαμο του Περού); Άλλο
it: Allergeni: Alfa-isometilionone; Amyl cinnamal (aldeide amilcinnamica); Alcol amilcinnamilico; Alcool anisile; Alcool benzilico; Benzile benzoato; Cinnamato di benzile; Salicilato di benzile; Cinnamal; Alcool cinnamilico; Citrale; Citronellolo; Cumarina; Eugenolo; Estratto di Evernia furfuracea (muschio d'albero).; Estratto di Evernia prunastri (muschio di quercia).; Farnesolo; Geraniolo; Hexyl cinnamal; Idrossicitronellale; Isoeugenolo; Limonene; Linalolo; Lyral (idrossiisoesil 3-cicloesene carbossaldeide); Metil 2-ottinoato (carbonato di metileptina); Myroxylon pereirae (balsamo del Perù); Altro
pt-PT: Alergénios: Alfa-isometil-ionona; Amilcinamal (aldeído amilcinâmico); Álcool amilcinamílico; Álcool anisílico; Álcool benzílico; Benzoato de benzilo; Cinamato de benzilo; Salicilato de benzilo; Cinnamal; Álcool cinamílico; Citral; Citronelol; Cumarina; Eugenol; Extrato de Evernia furfuracea (musgo de árvore); Extrato de Evernia prunastri (musgo de carvalho); Farnesol; Geraniol; Hexyl cinnamal; Hidroxicitronelal; Isoeugenol; Limoneno; Linalol; Lyral (hidroxiisohexil 3-ciclohexeno carboxaldeído); 2-octinoato de metilo (carbonato de heptino de metilo); Myroxylon pereirae (bálsamo do Peru); Outro